Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.110

Destruction of information relating to employee misconduct.

Nothing in this chapter prevents an agency from destroying information relating to employee misconduct or alleged misconduct, in accordance with RCW 41.06.450, to the extent necessary to ensure fairness to the employee.

[ 1982 c 208 s 13. Formerly RCW 42.17.295.]